Wyoming, session 2026, HB0185.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The legislature finds that:

(i) The United States drug enforcement
administration lists kratom, or mitragyna speciosa, as a
drug and chemical of concern;
HB0185

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0472

(ii) The United States food and drug
administration has recommended federal scheduling for
7-hydroxymitragynine, a concentrated kratom alkaloid;

(iii) The centers for disease control and the
food and drug administration recently documented a
forty-one (41) state salmonella outbreak linked to kratom
products;

(iv) Emerging data shows rising emergency
medical services encounters and poison control center
encounters involving kratom products.

Section 2. W.S. 35-7-2201 through 35-7-2206 are
created to read:

ARTICLE 22
KRATOM PRODUCT PROHIBITION

35-7-2201. Short title.

HB0185

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0472
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Kratom
Product Prohibition Act."

35-7-2202. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Concentrated kratom alkaloid" means
mitragynine or 7-hydroxymitragynine that is isolated,
synthesized, semi-synthesized or present above naturally
occurring mitragyna speciosa plant levels;

(ii) "Kratom" means any part of the plant
mitragyna speciosa in any form and any product marketed,
sold or represented as containing mitragyna speciosa;

(iii) "Kratom product" means any item containing
kratom or a concentrated kratom alkaloid that is meant for
human consumption;

(iv) "Research institution" means a university
or laboratory approved by an institutional review board.

HB0185

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0472
35-7-2203. Prohibited acts.

No person shall knowingly manufacture, sell, distribute or
possess a kratom product.

35-7-2204. Exemptions.

(a) The following entities are exempt from the
prohibitions under W.S. 35-7-2203:

(i) Research institutions;

(ii) Law enforcement and forensic laboratories
that conduct testing on kratom products.

35-7-2205. Penalties.

(a) A person who violates W.S. 35-7-2203:

(i) For a first offense, is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than
six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00), or both;
HB0185

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0472

(ii) For a second or subsequent offense, is
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not
more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

(b) Each manufacture, sale, distribution or
possession of a kratom product shall be considered a
separate offense under this section.

35-7-2206. Seizure and forfeiture.

Kratom products shall be considered contraband and shall be
subject to forfeiture in the same manner as provided by
W.S. 35-7-1049.

Section 3. W.S. 35-7-1049(a) by creating a new
paragraph (ix) is amended to read:

35-7-1049. Forfeitures and seizures generally;
property subject to forfeiture.

(a) The following are subject to forfeiture:
HB0185

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0472

(ix) Kratom products, as defined by W.S.
35-7-2202(a)(iii), and all raw materials, products and
equipment of any kind that are used, or intended for use,
in manufacturing, processing, delivering, importing or
exporting any kratom products.

Section 4.

(a) The department of agriculture is authorized one
(1) full-time employee for the purpose of testing kratom
products as required by this act. There is appropriated one
hundred ninety-seven thousand five hundred forty dollars
($197,540.00) from the general fund to the department of
agriculture for the salary and benefits of the position
created by this subsection. This appropriation shall be for
the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation and this position be included in the
HB0185

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0472
department of agriculture's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

(b) There is appropriated twenty-four thousand
dollars ($24,000.00) from the general fund to the
department of agriculture to purchase equipment necessary
for the testing of kratom products as required by this act.
This appropriation shall be for the period beginning July
1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028. These funds shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
included in the department of agriculture's standard budget
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 5. The department of agriculture, in
consultation with the attorney general, shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0185

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0472
Section 6.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 5 and 6 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0185